Florida, session 2026, SB1734.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 75 76 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 14.33, Florida 77 Statutes, is amended to read: 78 14.33âMedal of Heroism.â 79 (1)âThe Governor may award a Medal of Heroism of 80 appropriate design, with ribbons and appurtenances, to a law 81 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer, 82 juvenile detention officer, or juvenile probation officer, as 83 defined in s. 943.10(14); a firefighter, as defined in s. 84 112.191(1)(b); an emergency medical technician, as defined in s. 85 401.23; or a paramedic, as defined in s. 401.23. A recipient 86 must have distinguished himself or herself conspicuously by 87 gallantry and intrepidity, must have risked his or her life 88 deliberately above and beyond the call of duty while performing 89 duty in his or her respective position, and must have engaged in 90 hazardous or perilous activities to preserve lives with the 91 knowledge that such activities might result in great personal 92 harm. 93 Section 2.âSection 112.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to 94 read: 95 112.19âLaw enforcement, correctional, and correctional 96 probation officers; death benefits.â 97 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 98 (a)ââEmployerâ means a state board, commission, department, 99 division, bureau, or agency, or a county, municipality, or other 100 political subdivision of the state, which employs, appoints, or 101 otherwise engages the services of law enforcement, correctional, 102 or correctional probation officers. 103 (b)ââFresh pursuitâ means the pursuit of a person who has 104 committed or is reasonably suspected of having committed a 105 felony, misdemeanor, traffic infraction, or violation of a 106 county or municipal ordinance. The term does not imply instant 107 pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay. 108 (c)ââInsuranceâ means insurance procured from a stock 109 company or mutual company or association or exchange authorized 110 to do business as an insurer in this state. 111 (d)ââLaw enforcement, correctional, or correctional 112 probation officerâ means any officer as defined in s. 943.10(14) 113 or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the 114 state, including any law enforcement officer, correctional 115 officer, correctional probation officer, juvenile detention 116 officer, juvenile probation officer, state attorney 117 investigator, public defender investigator, or criminal conflict 118 and civil regional counsel investigator, whose duties require 119 such officer or employee to investigate, pursue, apprehend, 120 arrest, transport, or maintain custody of persons who are 121 charged with, suspected of committing, or convicted of a crime; 122 and the term includes any member of a bomb disposal unit whose 123 primary responsibility is the location, handling, and disposal 124 of explosive devices. The term also includes any full-time 125 officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision of 126 the state, certified pursuant to chapter 943, whose duties 127 require such officer to serve process or to attend a session of 128 a circuit or county court as bailiff. 129 (2)(a)âThe sum of $75,000 must be paid as provided in this 130 section when a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional 131 probation officer, while engaged in the performance of the 132 officerâs law enforcement duties, is accidentally killed or 133 receives accidental bodily injury which results in the loss of 134 the officerâs life, provided that such killing is not the result 135 of suicide and that such bodily injury is not intentionally 136 self-inflicted. 137 (b)âThe sum of $75,000 must be paid as provided in this 138 section if a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional 139 probation officer is accidentally killed as specified in 140 paragraph (a) and the accidental death occurs: 141 1.âAs a result of the officerâs response to fresh pursuit; 142 2.âAs a result of the officerâs response to what is 143 reasonably believed to be an emergency; 144 3.âAt the scene of a traffic accident to which the officer 145 has responded; or 146 4.âWhile the officer is enforcing what is reasonably 147 believed to be a traffic law or ordinance. 148 149 This sum is in addition to any sum provided for in paragraph 150 (a). 151 (c)âIf a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional 152 probation officer, while engaged in the performance of the 153 officerâs law enforcement duties, is unlawfully and 154 intentionally killed or dies as a result of such unlawful and 155 intentional act, the sum of $225,000 must be paid as provided in 156 this section. 157 (d)âSuch payments, pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), and 158 (c), whether secured by insurance or not, must be made to the 159 beneficiary designated by such law enforcement, correctional, or 160 correctional probation officer in writing, signed by the officer 161 and delivered to the employer during the officerâs lifetime. If 162 no such designation is made, then the payments must be paid to 163 the officerâs surviving child or children and to the officerâs 164 surviving spouse in equal portions, and if there is no surviving 165 child or spouse, then to the officerâs parent or parents. If a 166 beneficiary is not designated and there is no surviving child, 167 spouse, or parent, then the sum must be paid to the officerâs 168 estate. 169 (e)âSuch payments, pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), and 170 (c), are in addition to any workersâ compensation or retirement 171 plan benefits and are exempt from the claims and demands of 172 creditors of such law enforcement, correctional, or correctional 173 probation officer. 174 (f)âIf a full-time law enforcement, correctional, or 175 correctional probation officer who is certified pursuant to 176 chapter 943 and employed by a state agency is killed in the line 177 of duty while the officer is engaged in the performance of law 178 enforcement duties or as a result of an assault against the 179 officer under riot conditions: 180 1.âThe sum of $10,000 must be paid, as provided for in 181 paragraph (d), toward the funeral and burial expenses of such 182 officer. Such benefits are in addition to any other benefits to 183 which employee beneficiaries and dependents are entitled under 184 the Workersâ Compensation Law or any other state or federal 185 statutes; and 186 2.âThe officerâs employing agency may pay up to $5,000 187 directly toward the venue expenses associated with the funeral 188 and burial services of such officer. 189 (g)âAny political subdivision of the state that employs a 190 full-time law enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10(1) or 191 a full-time correctional officer as defined in s. 943.10(2) who 192 is killed in the line of duty on or after July 1, 1993, as a 193 result of an act of violence inflicted by another person while 194 the officer is engaged in the performance of law enforcement 195 duties or as a result of an assault against the officer under 196 riot conditions shall pay the entire premium of the political 197 subdivisionâs health insurance plan for the employeeâs surviving 198 spouse until remarried, and for each dependent child of the 199 employee until the child reaches the age of majority or until 200 the end of the calendar year in which the child reaches the age 201 of 25 if: 202 1.âAt the time of the employeeâs death, the child is 203 dependent upon the employee for support; and 204 2.âThe surviving child continues to be dependent for 205 support, or the surviving child is a full-time or part-time 206 student and is dependent for support. 207 (h)1.âAny employer who employs a full-time law enforcement, 208 correctional, or correctional probation officer who, on or after 209 January 1, 1995, suffers a catastrophic injury, as defined in s. 210 440.02, Florida Statutes 2002, in the line of duty shall pay the 211 entire premium of the employerâs health insurance plan for the 212 injured employee, the injured employeeâs spouse, and for each 213 dependent child of the injured employee until the child reaches 214 the age of majority or until the end of the calendar year in 215 which the child reaches the age of 25 if the child continues to 216 be dependent for support, or the child is a full-time or part 217 time student and is dependent for support. The term âhealth 218 insurance planâ does not include supplemental benefits that are 219 not part of the basic group health insurance plan. If the 220 injured employee subsequently dies, the employer shall continue 221 to pay the entire health insurance premium for the surviving 222 spouse until remarried, and for the dependent children, under 223 the conditions outlined in this paragraph. However: 224 a.âHealth insurance benefits payable from any other source 225 shall reduce benefits payable under this section. 226 b.âIt is unlawful for a person to willfully and knowingly 227 make, or cause to be made, or to assist, conspire with, or urge 228 another to make, or cause to be made, any false, fraudulent, or 229 misleading oral or written statement to obtain health insurance 230 coverage as provided under this paragraph. A person who violates 231 this sub-subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 232 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 233 c.âIn addition to any applicable criminal penalty, upon 234 conviction for a violation as described in sub-subparagraph b., 235 a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation 236 officer or other beneficiary who receives or seeks to receive 237 health insurance benefits under this paragraph shall forfeit the 238 right to receive such health insurance benefits, and shall 239 reimburse the employer for all benefits paid due to the fraud or 240 other prohibited activity. For purposes of this sub 241 subparagraph, the term âconvictionâ means a determination of 242 guilt that is the result of a plea or trial, regardless of 243 whether adjudication is withheld. 244 2.âIn order for the officer, spouse, and dependent children 245 to be eligible for such insurance coverage, the injury must have 246 occurred while the officer was in the line of duty or engaged in 247 an official training exercise. Except as otherwise provided 248 herein, this paragraph may not be construed to limit health 249 insurance coverage for which the officer, spouse, or dependent 250 children may otherwise be eligible, except that a person who 251 qualifies under this section is not eligible for the health 252 insurance subsidy provided under chapter 121, chapter 175, or 253 chapter 185. 254 (i)âThe Bureau of Crime Prevention and Training within the 255 Department of Legal Affairs shall adopt rules necessary to 256 implement paragraphs (a), (b), and (c). 257 (3)âIf a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional 258 probation officer is accidentally killed as specified in 259 paragraph (2)(b) on or after June 22, 1990, but before July 1, 260 2019, or unlawfully and intentionally killed as specified in 261 paragraph (2)(c) on or after July 1, 1980, but before July 1, 262 2019, the state must waive certain educational expenses that the 263 child or spouse of the deceased officer incurs while obtaining a 264 career certificate, an undergraduate education, or a 265 postgraduate education. The amount waived by the state must be 266 in an amount equal to the cost of tuition and matriculation and 267 registration fees for a total of 120 credit hours. The child or 268 spouse may attend a state career center, a Florida College 269 System institution, or a state university on either a full-time 270 or part-time basis. The benefits provided to a child under this 271 subsection shall continue until the childâs 25th birthday. The 272 benefits provided to a spouse under this subsection must 273 commence within 5 years after the death occurs, and entitlement 274 thereto shall continue until the 10th anniversary of that death. 275 (a)âUpon failure of any child or spouse who receives a 276 waiver in accordance with this subsection to comply with the 277 ordinary and minimum requirements regarding discipline and 278 scholarship of the institution attended, such benefits must be 279 withdrawn as to the child or spouse and no further moneys may be 280 expended for the childâs or spouseâs benefits so long as such 281 failure or delinquency continues. 282 (b)âOnly a student in good standing in his or her 283 respective institution may receive the benefits provided in this 284 subsection. 285 (c)âA child or spouse receiving benefits under this 286 subsection must be enrolled according to the customary rules and 287 requirements of the institution attended. 288 (4)(a)âThe employer of such law enforcement, correctional, 289 or correctional probation officer is liable for the payment of 290 the sums specified in this section and is deemed self-insured, 291 unless it procures and maintains, or has already procured and 292 maintained, insurance to secure such payments. Any such 293 insurance may cover only the risks indicated in this section, in 294 the amounts indicated in this section, or it may cover those 295 risks and additional risks and may be in larger amounts. Any 296 such insurance must be placed by such employer only after public 297 bid of such insurance coverage which must be awarded to the 298 carrier making the lowest best bid. 299 (b)âPayment of benefits to beneficiaries of state 300 employees, or of the premiums to cover the risk, under this 301 section must be paid from existing funds otherwise appropriated 302 to the department employing the law enforcement, correctional, 303 or correctional probation officers. 304 (5)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules and 305 procedures, and the Board of Governors shall adopt regulations 306 and procedures, as are appropriate and necessary to implement 307 the educational benefits provisions of this section. 308 (6)âNotwithstanding any provision of this section to the 309 contrary, the death benefits provided in paragraphs (2)(c) and 310 (g) shall also be applicable and paid in cases where an officer 311 received bodily injury before July 1, 1993, and subsequently 312 died on or after July 1, 1993, as a result of such in-line-of 313 duty injury attributable to an unlawful and intentional act, or 314 an act of violence inflicted by another, or an assault on the 315 officer under riot conditions. Payment of such benefits must be 316 in accordance with this section. This subsection may not be 317 construed to limit death benefits for which those individuals 318 listed in paragraph (2)(d) may otherwise be eligible. 319 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and subsections 320 (2) and (3) of section 112.193, Florida Statutes, are amended to 321 read: 322 112.193âLaw enforcement, correctional, and correctional 323 probation, juvenile detention, and juvenile probation officersâ 324 commemorative service awards.â 325 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 326 (b)ââLaw enforcement, correctional, or correctional 327 probation, juvenile detention, or juvenile probation officerâ 328 means any full-time, part-time, or auxiliary officer as defined 329 in s. 943.10(14). 330 (2)âEach employer that employs or appoints law enforcement, 331 correctional, or correctional probation, juvenile detention, or 332 juvenile probation officers may present to each such employee 333 who retires under any provision of a state or municipal 334 retirement system, including medical disability retirement, or 335 who is eligible to retire under any such provision but, instead, 336 resigns from one employer to accept an elected public office, 337 one complete uniform including the badge worn by that officer, 338 the officerâs service handgun, if one was issued as part of the 339 officerâs equipment, and an identification card clearly marked 340 âRETIRED.â 341 (3)âUpon the death of a law enforcement, correctional, or 342 correctional probation, juvenile detention, or juvenile 343 probation officer, the employer may present to the spouse or 344 other beneficiary of the officer, upon request, one complete 345 uniform, including the badge worn by the officer. However, if a 346 law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation, 347 juvenile detention, or juvenile probation officer is killed in 348 the line of duty, the employer may present, upon request, to the 349 spouse or other beneficiary of the officer the officerâs 350 service-issued handgun, if one was issued as part of the 351 officerâs equipment. If the employer is not in possession of the 352 service-issued handgun, the employer may, within its discretion, 353 and upon written request of the spouse or other beneficiary, 354 present a similar handgun. The provisions of this section shall 355 also apply in that instance to a law enforcement or correctional 356 officer who died before May 1, 1993. In addition, the officerâs 357 service handgun may be presented by the employer for any such 358 officer who was killed in the line of duty prior to this act 359 becoming a law. 360 Section 4.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 112.194, 361 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 362 112.194âLaw enforcement and correctional, juvenile 363 detention, and juvenile probation officersâ Medal of Valor.â 364 (1)âAny state board, commission, department, division, 365 bureau, or agency, or any county or municipality that employs or 366 appoints law enforcement officers, or correctional officers, 367 juvenile detention officers, or juvenile probation officers, as 368 defined in s. 943.10(14), may establish an award program to 369 award a Medal of Valor to any such officer whose actions are 370 extraordinary and expose the officer to peril beyond the call of 371 duty. 372 (3)âUpon the death of such a law enforcement officer or 373 correctional officer, juvenile detention officer, or juvenile 374 probation officer, the employer may present the Medal of Valor 375 posthumously to the officerâs closest living relative. 376 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 377 787.035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 378 787.035âSheltering unmarried minors; aiding unmarried minor 379 runaways; violations.â 380 (1)(a)âA person who is not an authorized agent of the 381 Department of Juvenile Justice or the Department of Children and 382 Families may not knowingly shelter an unmarried minor for more 383 than 24 hours without the consent of the minorâs parent or 384 guardian or without notifying a law enforcement officer of the 385 minorâs name and the fact that the minor is being provided 386 shelter. 387 Section 6.âSubsection (14) of section 943.10, Florida 388 Statutes, is amended, and new subsections (23) and (24) are 389 added to that section, to read: 390 943.10âDefinitions; ss. 943.085-943.255.âThe following 391 words and phrases as used in ss. 943.085-943.255 are defined as 392 follows: 393 (14)ââOfficerâ means any person employed or appointed as a 394 full-time, part-time, or auxiliary law enforcement officer, 395 correctional officer, or correctional probation officer, 396 juvenile detention officer, or juvenile probation officer. 397 (23)ââJuvenile detention officerâ means an officer who is 398 responsible for the direct supervision of youth who are held in 399 secure detention. The term includes all certified supervisory 400 personnel whose duties include, in whole or in part, the 401 supervision, training, and guidance of juvenile detention 402 officers, but does not include support personnel employed by the 403 employing agency. 404 (24)ââJuvenile probation officerâ means an authorized agent 405 of the Department of Juvenile Justice who performs the intake, 406 case management, or supervision functions. The term includes all 407 certified supervisory personnel whose duties include, in whole 408 or in part, the supervision, training, and guidance of juvenile 409 probation officers, but does not include support personnel 410 employed by the employing agency. 411 Section 7.âSubsection (15) of section 984.03, Florida 412 Statutes, is amended to read: 413 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 414 (15)ââFamily in need of servicesâ means a family that has a 415 child who is running away; who is ungovernable and persistently 416 disobeying reasonable and lawful demands of the parent, or legal 417 guardian, or custodian and is beyond the control of the parent, 418 or legal guardian, or custodian; or who is a habitual truant or 419 engaging in other serious behaviors that place the child at risk 420 of future abuse, neglect, or abandonment or at risk of entering 421 the juvenile justice system. The child must be referred to a law 422 enforcement agency, the department, or an agency contracted to 423 provide services to children in need of services. A family is 424 not eligible to receive voluntary family services if, at the 425 time of the referral, the child is currently under court-ordered 426 supervision by the department for delinquency under chapter 985 427 or under court-ordered supervision by the Department of Children 428 and Families under chapter 39. 429 Section 8.âSubsection (2) of section 984.09, Florida 430 Statutes, is amended to read: 431 984.09âPunishment for contempt of court; alternative 432 sanctions.â 433 (2)âPLACEMENT IN A SHELTER.âA child subject to proceedings 434 under this chapter adjudicated as a child in need of services 435 may only be placed in a shelter for purposes of punishment for 436 contempt of court if alternative sanctions are unavailable or 437 inappropriate, or if the child has already been ordered to serve 438 an alternative sanction but failed to comply with the sanction. 439 Section 9.âSection 985.6865, Florida Statutes, is amended 440 to read: 441 985.6865âJuvenile detention costs.â 442 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 443 (a)ââDetention careâ means secure detention and respite 444 beds for juveniles charged with a domestic violence crime. 445 (b)ââFiscally constrained countyâ means a county within a 446 rural area of opportunity as designated by the Governor pursuant 447 to s. 288.0656 or each county for which the value of a mill will 448 raise no more than $5 million in revenue, based on the certified 449 school taxable value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., 450 from the previous July 1. 451 (c)ââTotal shared detention costsâ means the amount of 452 funds expended by the department for the costs of detention care 453 for the prior fiscal year. This amount includes the most recent 454 actual certify forward amounts minus any funds it expends on 455 detention care for juveniles residing in fiscally constrained 456 counties or out of state. 457 (2)âAnnually by July 15, the department shall calculate and 458 provide to each county that is not a fiscally constrained county 459 and that does not provide its own detention care for juveniles 460 its annual percentage share by dividing the total number of 461 detention days for juveniles residing in the county for the most 462 recently completed 12-month period by the total number of 463 detention days for juveniles in all counties that are not 464 fiscally constrained counties during the same period. The annual 465 percentage share of each county that is not a fiscally 466 constrained county and that does not provide its own detention 467 care for juveniles must be multiplied by 50 percent of the total 468 shared detention costs to determine that countyâs share of 469 detention costs. Beginning August 1, each such county shall pay 470 to the department its share of detention costs, which shall be 471 paid in 12 equal payments due on the first day of each month. 472 The state shall pay the remaining actual costs of detention 473 care. 474 (3)âEach quarter, the department shall review county 475 juvenile detention payments to ensure that counties fulfill 476 their financial responsibilities required under this section. If 477 the department determines that a county has not met its 478 obligations, the department must direct the Department of 479 Revenue to deduct the amount owed to the department from the 480 funds provided to the county under s. 218.23. The Department of 481 Revenue shall transfer the funds withheld into the Shared 482 County/State Juvenile Detention Trust Fund. 483 (4)âAs an assurance to holders of bonds issued by counties 484 before July 1 of each year, for which distributions made 485 pursuant to s. 218.23 are pledged, or bonds issued to refund 486 such bonds which mature no later than the bonds they refunded 487 and which result in a reduction of debt service payable in each 488 fiscal year, the amount available for distribution to a county 489 shall remain as provided by law and continue to be subject to 490 any lien or claim on behalf of the bondholders. The Department 491 of Revenue must ensure, based on information provided by an 492 affected county, that any reduction in amounts distributed 493 pursuant to subsection (3) does not reduce the amount of 494 distribution to a county below the amount necessary for the 495 timely payment of principal and interest when due on the bonds 496 and the amount necessary to comply with any covenant under the 497 bond resolution or other documents relating to the issuance of 498 the bonds. If a reduction to a countyâs monthly distribution 499 must be decreased in order to comply with this section, the 500 Department of Revenue must notify the department of the amount 501 of the decrease, and the department must send a bill for payment 502 of such amount to the affected county. 503 (5)âThe state shall pay all costs of detention care for 504 juveniles residing in a fiscally constrained county and for 505 juveniles residing out of state. The state shall pay all costs 506 of detention care for juveniles housed in state detention 507 centers from counties that provide their own detention care for 508 juveniles. 509 (6)(4)âEach county that is not a fiscally constrained 510 county and that does not provide its own detention care for 511 juveniles shall incorporate into its annual county budget 512 sufficient funds to pay its annual percentage share of the total 513 shared detention costs required by subsection (2). 514 (7)(5)âFunds paid by the counties to the department 515 pursuant to this section must be deposited into the Shared 516 County/State Juvenile Detention Trust Fund. 517 (6)âThe department shall determine each quarter whether the 518 counties are remitting funds as required by this section. 519 (8)(7)âFunds received from counties pursuant to this 520 section are not subject to the service charges provided in s. 521 215.20. 522 (9)(8)âThe department may adopt rules to administer this 523 section. 524 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 525 made by this act to section 112.19, Florida Statutes, in a 526 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 527 112.1912, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 528 112.1912âFirst responders; death benefits for educational 529 expenses.â 530 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âfirst responderâ 531 means: 532 (a)âA law enforcement, correctional, or correctional 533 probation officer as defined in s. 112.19(1) who is killed as 534 provided in s. 112.19(2) on or after July 1, 2019; 535 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 536 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a 537 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 384.287, Florida 538 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 539 384.287âScreening for sexually transmissible disease.â 540 (1)âAn officer as defined in s. 943.10(14); support 541 personnel as defined in s. 943.10(11) who are employed by the 542 Department of Law Enforcement, including, but not limited to, 543 any crime scene analyst, forensic technologist, or crime lab 544 analyst; firefighter as defined in s. 633.102; or ambulance 545 driver, paramedic, or emergency medical technician as defined in 546 s. 401.23, acting within the scope of employment, who comes into 547 contact with a person in such a way that significant exposure, 548 as defined in s. 381.004, has occurred may request that the 549 person be screened for a sexually transmissible disease that can 550 be transmitted through a significant exposure. 551 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 552 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a 553 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 493.6102, Florida 554 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 555 493.6102âInapplicability of this chapter.âThis chapter 556 shall not apply to: 557 (1)âAny individual who is an âofficerâ as defined in s. 558 943.10(14) or is a law enforcement officer of the United States 559 Government, while such local, state, or federal officer is 560 engaged in her or his official duties or when performing off 561 duty security activities approved by her or his superiors. 562 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 563 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a 564 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 565 741.31, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 566 741.31âViolation of an injunction for protection against 567 domestic violence.â 568 (4) 569 (b)1.âIt is a violation of s. 790.233, and a misdemeanor of 570 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 571 775.083, for a person to violate a final injunction for 572 protection against domestic violence by having in his or her 573 care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or ammunition. 574 2.âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the 575 disabilities regarding possession of firearms and ammunition are 576 consistent with federal law. Accordingly, this paragraph shall 577 not apply to a state or local officer as defined in s. 578 943.10(14), holding an active certification, who receives or 579 possesses a firearm or ammunition for use in performing official 580 duties on behalf of the officerâs employing agency, unless 581 otherwise prohibited by the employing agency. 582 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 583 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a 584 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 782.07, Florida 585 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 586 782.07âManslaughter; aggravated manslaughter of an elderly 587 person or disabled adult; aggravated manslaughter of a child; 588 aggravated manslaughter of an officer, a firefighter, an 589 emergency medical technician, or a paramedic.â 590 (4)âA person who causes the death, through culpable 591 negligence, of an officer as defined in s. 943.10(14), a 592 firefighter as defined in s. 112.191, an emergency medical 593 technician as defined in s. 401.23, or a paramedic as defined in 594 s. 401.23, while the officer, firefighter, emergency medical 595 technician, or paramedic is performing duties that are within 596 the course of his or her employment, commits aggravated 597 manslaughter of an officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical 598 technician, or a paramedic, a felony of the first degree, 599 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 600 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 601 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a 602 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 790.233, Florida 603 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 604 790.233âPossession of firearm or ammunition prohibited when 605 person is subject to an injunction against committing acts of 606 domestic violence, stalking, or cyberstalking; penalties.â 607 (3)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the 608 disabilities regarding possession of firearms and ammunition are 609 consistent with federal law. Accordingly, this section does not 610 apply to a state or local officer as defined in s. 943.10(14), 611 holding an active certification, who receives or possesses a 612 firearm or ammunition for use in performing official duties on 613 behalf of the officerâs employing agency, unless otherwise 614 prohibited by the employing agency. 615 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 616 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in 617 references thereto, subsection (1) and paragraph (e) of 618 subsection (37) of section 39.01, Florida Statutes, are 619 reenacted to read: 620 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 621 context otherwise requires: 622 (1)ââAbandonedâ or âabandonmentâ means a situation in which 623 the parent or legal custodian of a child or, in the absence of a 624 parent or legal custodian, the caregiver, while being able, has 625 made no significant contribution to the childâs care and 626 maintenance or has failed to establish or maintain a substantial 627 and positive relationship with the child, or both. For purposes 628 of this subsection, âestablish or maintain a substantial and 629 positive relationshipâ includes, but is not limited to, frequent 630 and regular contact with the child through frequent and regular 631 visitation or frequent and regular communication to or with the 632 child, and the exercise of parental rights and responsibilities. 633 Marginal efforts and incidental or token visits or 634 communications are not sufficient to establish or maintain a 635 substantial and positive relationship with a child. A manâs 636 acknowledgment of paternity of the child does not limit the 637 period of time considered in determining whether the child was 638 abandoned. The term does not include a surrendered infant as 639 described in s. 383.50, a âchild in need of servicesâ as defined 640 in chapter 984, or a âfamily in need of servicesâ as defined in 641 chapter 984. The absence of a parent, legal custodian, or 642 caregiver responsible for a childâs welfare, who is a 643 servicemember, by reason of deployment or anticipated deployment 644 as defined in 50 U.S.C. s. 3938(e), may not be considered or 645 used as a factor in determining abandonment. The incarceration, 646 repeated incarceration, or extended incarceration of a parent, 647 legal custodian, or caregiver responsible for a childâs welfare 648 may support a finding of abandonment. 649 (37)ââHarmâ to a childâs health or welfare can occur when 650 any person: 651 (e)âAbandons the child. Within the context of the 652 definition of âharm,â the term âabandoned the childâ or 653 âabandonment of the childâ means a situation in which the parent 654 or legal custodian of a child or, in the absence of a parent or 655 legal custodian, the caregiver, while being able, has made no 656 significant contribution to the childâs care and maintenance or 657 has failed to establish or maintain a substantial and positive 658 relationship with the child, or both. For purposes of this 659 paragraph, âestablish or maintain a substantial and positive 660 relationshipâ includes, but is not limited to, frequent and 661 regular contact with the child through frequent and regular 662 visitation or frequent and regular communication to or with the 663 child, and the exercise of parental rights and responsibilities. 664 Marginal efforts and incidental or token visits or 665 communications are not sufficient to establish or maintain a 666 substantial and positive relationship with a child. The term 667 âabandonedâ does not include a surrendered infant as described 668 in s. 383.50, a child in need of services as defined in chapter 669 984, or a family in need of services as defined in chapter 984. 670 The incarceration, repeated incarceration, or extended 671 incarceration of a parent, legal custodian, or caregiver 672 responsible for a childâs welfare may support a finding of 673 abandonment. 674 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 675 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 676 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 677 44.1011, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 678 44.1011âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 679 (2)ââMediationâ means a process whereby a neutral third 680 person called a mediator acts to encourage and facilitate the 681 resolution of a dispute between two or more parties. It is an 682 informal and nonadversarial process with the objective of 683 helping the disputing parties reach a mutually acceptable and 684 voluntary agreement. In mediation, decisionmaking authority 685 rests with the parties. The role of the mediator includes, but 686 is not limited to, assisting the parties in identifying issues, 687 fostering joint problem solving, and exploring settlement 688 alternatives. âMediationâ includes: 689 (d)ââDependency or in need of services mediation,â which 690 means mediation of dependency, child in need of services, or 691 family in need of services matters. Negotiations in dependency 692 or in need of services mediation are primarily conducted by the 693 parties. Counsel for each party may attend the mediation 694 conference and privately communicate with their clients. 695 However, presence of counsel is not required and, in the 696 discretion of the mediator and with the agreement of the 697 parties, mediation may proceed in the absence of counsel unless 698 otherwise ordered by the court. 699 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 700 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 701 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 702 44.102, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 703 44.102âCourt-ordered mediation.â 704 (2)âA court, under rules adopted by the Supreme Court: 705 (d)âIn circuits in which a dependency or in need of 706 services mediation program has been established, may refer to 707 mediation all or any portion of a matter relating to dependency 708 or to a child in need of services or a family in need of 709 services. 710 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 711 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 712 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 984.04, Florida 713 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 714 984.04âEarly truancy intervention; families in need of 715 services and children in need of services; procedures and 716 jurisdiction.â 717 (1)âThe department shall be responsible for all nonjudicial 718 proceedings involving voluntary family services for a family 719 identified as a family in need of services according to rules 720 established by the department under chapter 120. 721 Section 20.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 722 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 723 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 984.071, Florida 724 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 725 984.071âResources and information.â 726 (1)âThe department shall develop and publish an information 727 guide that explains the current process under this chapter for 728 obtaining assistance for a child in need of services or a family 729 in need of services and the community services and resources 730 available to parents. The information guide shall be published 731 in a written format for distribution and shall also be published 732 on the departmentâs website. Each information guide shall be 733 reviewed annually and updated as appropriate. The school 734 district shall distribute this information guide to parents of 735 truant children, and to other parents upon request or as deemed 736 appropriate by the school district. In addition, the department 737 shall distribute the information guide to state and local law 738 enforcement agencies. Any law enforcement officer who has 739 contact with the parent of a child who is locked out of the 740 home, who is ungovernable, or who runs away from home shall make 741 the information guide available to the parent. 742 Section 21.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 743 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in 744 references thereto, subsections (1) and (2) of section 984.10, 745 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 746 984.10âIntake.â 747 (1)âIntake shall be performed by the department or the 748 departmentâs authorized agent. A report alleging that a child is 749 from a family in need of services shall be made to the intake 750 office operating in the county in which the child is found or in 751 which the case arose. Any person or agency, including, but not 752 limited to, the parent, legal guardian, or custodian, the local 753 school district, a law enforcement agency, or the Department of 754 Children and Families, having knowledge of the facts may make a 755 report. 756 (2)âA representative of the department shall make a 757 preliminary determination as to whether the report is complete. 758 The criteria for the completeness of a report with respect to a 759 child alleged to be from a family in need of services while 760 subject to compulsory school attendance shall be governed by s. 761 984.03. In any case in which the representative of the 762 department finds that the report is incomplete, the 763 representative of the department shall return the report without 764 delay to the person or agency originating the report or having 765 knowledge of the facts or to the appropriate law enforcement 766 agency having investigative jurisdiction and request additional 767 information in order to complete the report. 768 Section 22.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 769 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 770 reference thereto, section 984.12, Florida Statutes, is 771 reenacted to read: 772 984.12âCase staffing; services and treatment related to a 773 family in need of services.â 774 (1)âThe appropriate representative of the department shall 775 request a meeting of the family and child with a case staffing 776 committee to review the case of any family or child who the 777 department determines is in need of services if: 778 (a)âThe family or child is not in agreement with the 779 services or treatment offered; 780 (b)âThe family or child will not participate in the 781 services or treatment selected; or 782 (c)âThe representative of the department needs assistance 783 in developing an appropriate plan for services. The time and 784 place selected for the meeting shall be convenient for the child 785 and family. 786 (2)âThe composition of the case staffing committee shall be 787 based on the needs of the family and child. It shall include a 788 representative from the childâs school district and a 789 representative of the department, and may include the 790 departmentâs authorized agent and a supervisor of the 791 departmentâs contracted provider; a representative from the area 792 of health, mental health, substance abuse, or social services; a 793 representative of the state attorney; a representative of law 794 enforcement; and any person recommended by the child, family, or 795 department. The child and the childâs parent, legal guardian, or 796 custodian must be invited to attend the committee meeting. 797 (3)âThe case staffing committee shall: 798 (a)âIdentify the familyâs concerns and contributing 799 factors. 800 (b)âRequest the family and child to identify their needs 801 and concerns. 802 (c)âSeek input from the school district and any other 803 persons in attendance with knowledge of the family or childâs 804 situation and concerns. 805 (d)âConsider the voluntary family services or other 806 community services that have been offered and the results of 807 those services. 808 (e)âIdentify whether truancy is a concern and evaluate 809 compliance with the remedial strategies provided pursuant to s. 810 1003.26. 811 (f)âReach a timely decision to provide the child or family 812 with services and recommend any appropriate treatment through 813 the development of a plan for services. 814 (4)âThe plan for services shall contain the following: 815 (a)âStatement of the concerns. 816 (b)âNeeds of the child. 817 (c)âNeeds of the parents, legal guardian, or custodian. 818 (d)âMeasurable objectives that address the identified 819 problems and needs. 820 (e)âServices and treatment to be provided, to include: 821 1.âType of services or treatment. 822 2.âFrequency of services or treatment. 823 3.âLocation. 824 4.âAccountable service providers or staff. 825 (f)âTimeframes for achieving objectives. 826 (5)âUpon receipt of the plan, the child and family shall 827 acknowledge their position by accepting or rejecting the 828 services and provisions in writing. If the plan is accepted, it 829 shall be implemented as soon as is practicable. 830 (6)âThe assigned case manager shall have responsibility for 831 implementing the plan. The departmentâs authorized agent shall 832 periodically review the progress towards achieving the 833 objectives of the plan in order to: 834 (a)âAdvise the case staffing committee of the need to make 835 adjustments to the plan; 836 (b)âRecommend a child in need of services petition be filed 837 by the department; or 838 (c)âTerminate the case as indicated by successful or 839 substantial achievement of the objectives of the plan. 840 (7)âThe parent, legal guardian, or custodian may convene a 841 meeting of the case staffing committee. A case staffing 842 committee meeting requested by a parent, guardian, or legal 843 custodian must be convened within 7 days, excluding weekends and 844 legal holidays, after the date the departmentâs representative 845 receives the request in writing. 846 (8)âAny other member of the committee may convene a meeting 847 if voluntary family services have been offered and the services 848 have been rejected by the child or family, or the child has not 849 made measurable progress toward achieving the service plan 850 goals, and the member finds that doing so is in the best 851 interest of the family or child. 852 (9)âA case staffing committee meeting must be convened 853 within 30 days after the date the case is referred by the court 854 pursuant to s. 984.151. 855 (10)âWithin 7 days after meeting, the case staffing 856 committee shall provide the parent, legal guardian, or custodian 857 with a written report that details the reasons for the 858 committeeâs decision to recommend, or decline to recommend, that 859 the department file a petition alleging that the child is a 860 child in need of services. 861 (11)âThe case staffing committee may reconvene from time to 862 time as may be necessary to make adjustments to the plan. 863 Section 23.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 864 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 865 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 984.13, Florida 866 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 867 984.13âTaking a child into custody.â 868 (3)âIf the child is taken into custody and is delivered to 869 a shelter, the departmentâs authorized agent shall review the 870 facts and make such further inquiry as necessary to determine 871 whether the child shall remain in shelter, receive voluntary 872 family services that would allow the child alleged to be from a 873 family in need of services to remain at home, or be released. 874 Section 24.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 875 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a 876 reference thereto, subsection (23) of section 985.03, Florida 877 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 878 985.03âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 879 (23)ââFamily in need of servicesâ has the same meaning as 880 provided in s. 984.03. 881 Section 25.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 882 made by this act to section 984.09, Florida Statutes, in a 883 reference thereto, subsection (33) of section 984.03, Florida 884 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 885 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 886 (33)ââShelterâ means a department-approved shelter facility 887 for the temporary care of runaway children; for children placed 888 for voluntary shelter respite upon request of the child or the 889 childâs parent, legal guardian, or custodian; or for placement 890 of a child who has been adjudicated a child in need of services 891 or who has been found in contempt of court under s. 984.09. 892 Shelters must provide 24-hour continual supervision. A shelter 893 must be licensed by the Department of Children and Families as a 894 licensed child-caring agency. 895 Section 26.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 896 made by this act to section 984.09, Florida Statutes, in a 897 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 984.07, Florida 898 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 899 984.07âRight to counsel; waiver; appointed counsel; 900 compensation.â 901 (1)âWhen a petition is filed alleging that a child is a 902 child in need of services or if the child is subject to contempt 903 proceedings under s. 984.09, the child must be represented by 904 counsel at each court appearance. The court must appoint counsel 905 unless the child is not indigent and has counsel present to 906 represent the child or the record in that proceeding 907 affirmatively demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that 908 the child knowingly and intelligently waived the right to 909 counsel after being fully advised by the court of the nature of 910 the proceedings and the dispositional alternatives available to 911 the court. If the child waives counsel at any proceeding, the 912 court shall advise the child with respect to the right to 913 counsel at every subsequent hearing. 914 Section 27.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 915 made by this act to section 984.09, Florida Statutes, in a 916 reference thereto, subsection (12) of section 984.151, Florida 917 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 918 984.151âEarly truancy intervention; truancy petition; 919 judgment.â 920 (12)âThe court may not order a child placed in shelter 921 pursuant to this section unless the court has found the child to 922 be in contempt for violation of a court order under s. 984.09. 923 Section 28.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.